Utah statutes.
63M-1-608.   Science education program.

(1) (a)  There is established an informal science and technology education program within the Governor's Office of Economic Development.

(b)  The state science advisor shall act as the executive director of the program.

(c)  The State Advisory Council on Science and Technology shall advise the program, including:

(i)  approving all money expended by the science and technology education program;

(ii)  approving all operations of the program; and

(iii)  making policies and procedures to govern the program.

(2)  The program may:

(a)  provide informal science and technology-based education to elementary and secondary students;

(b)  expose public education students to college level science and technology disciplines;

(c)  administer a science and technology camp program; and

(d)  provide other informal promotion of science and technology education in this state, including the direct sponsorship of science fairs and science olympiads.

(3)  The science and technology camp program described under Subsection (2)(c) shall be:

(a)  provided exclusively for elementary and secondary students and their teachers;

(b)  established as a grant program for camp providers; and

(c)  administered based upon annual requests for proposals, a documented review process, and grant awards.

